Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2834.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4020 of Title 56, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Oklahoma Health Care Authority shall expand Medicaid
coverage for Medicaid services or programs for in-home physical
therapy, occupational therapy, and speech therapy to ninety-six
percent (96%) of what Medicare coverage pays.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.

HB2834 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
OVERSIGHT, dated 03/05/2025 - DO PASS, As Coauthored.


















HB2834 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.